Maryland, session 2026, HB0136.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – General Provisions
5–101.
[(w) “Legislative unit” means:
(1) the General Assembly;
(2) either house of the General Assembly;
(3) a standing committee of the General Assembly, provided that the
presiding officer of the House of Delegates and the presiding officer of the Senate shall be
deemed an ex officio member of any standing committee of the presiding officer’s chamber;
or
(4) a county or regional delegation of members of the General Assembly
that is recognized by a presiding officer of the General Assembly.]
5–505.
(c) (1) Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, an official or employee
may accept a gift listed in paragraph (2) of this subsection unless:
(i) the gift would tend to impair the impartiality and independent
judgment of the official or employee; or
(ii) as to a gift of significant value:
1. the gift would give the appearance of impairing the
impartiality and independent judgment of the official or employee; or
2. the official or employee believes or has reason to believe
that the gift is designed to impair the impartiality and independent judgment of the official
or employee.

HOUSE BILL 136 3
(2) Subject to paragraph (1) of this subsection, subsection (b) of this section
does not apply to:
(i) 1. except for officials of the Legislative Branch, meals or
beverages received and consumed by the official or employee in the presence of the donor
or sponsoring entity;
2. for officials of the Legislative Branch, food or beverages
received and consumed by the official in the presence of the donor or sponsoring entity as
part of a meal or reception:
A. to which all members of [a legislative unit] THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY were invited; AND
B. THAT WAS OPEN TO THE PUBLIC;
3. for a member of the General Assembly, food or beverages
received from a donor or sponsoring entity, other than an individual regulated lobbyist
described in § 5–702(a)(1) of this title, during a period when the General Assembly is not
in session, at a location that is within a county that contains the member’s district, provided
that the donor or sponsoring entity is located within a county that contains the member’s
district; or
4. for a member of the General Assembly, food or beverages
received at the time and geographic location of a meeting of a legislative organization for
which the member’s presiding officer has approved the member’s attendance at State
expense;
5–607.
(a) A FINANCIAL DISCLOSURE statement that is required under § 5–601(a) of
this subtitle shall contain schedules disclosing the information and interests specified in
this section, if known, for the individual making the statement for the applicable period.
(e) (3) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the
schedule shall include each gift with a value of more than $20 and each of two or more gifts
with a cumulative value of $100 or more received from one entity during the applicable
period.
(ii) The FINANCIAL DISCLOSURE statement need not include as a
gift:
1. food or beverages received and consumed by an official of
the Legislative Branch in the presence of the donor or sponsoring entity as part of a meal
or reception:

HOUSE BILL 136
A. to which all members of [a legislative unit] THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY were invited; AND
B. THAT WAS OPEN TO THE PUBLIC;
2. food or beverages received by a member of the General
Assembly at the time and geographic location of a meeting of a legislative organization for
which the member’s presiding officer has approved the member’s attendance at State
expense; or
3. except as provided in subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph,
a ticket or free admission extended to a member of the General Assembly by the person
sponsoring or conducting the event as a courtesy or ceremony to the office to attend a
charitable, cultural, or political event to which all members of [a legislative unit] THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY were invited.
(iii) The FINANCIAL DISCLOSURE statement shall include the
acceptance of each of two or more tickets or free admissions, extended to a member of the
General Assembly by the person sponsoring or conducting the event, with a cumulative
value of $100 or more received from one entity during the applicable period.
5–705.
(a) (1) A regulated lobbyist shall file electronically with the Ethics
Commission, under oath and for each registration, a separate report concerning the
regulated lobbyist’s lobbying activities:
(i) by May 31 of each year, to cover the period from November 1 of
the previous year through April 30 of the current year; and
(ii) by November 30 of each year, to cover the period from May 1
through October 31 of that year.
(2) If the regulated lobbyist is not an individual, an authorized officer or
agent of the regulated lobbyist shall sign the report.
(3) If a prorated amount is reported as compensation, it shall be labeled as
prorated.
(b) A report required by this section shall include:
(1) a complete, current statement of the information required under §
5–704(b) of this subtitle;
(2) total expenditures in connection with influencing executive action or
legislative action in each of the following categories:

HOUSE BILL 136 5
(i) total individual regulated lobbyist compensation, excluding
expenses reported under this paragraph;
(ii) office expenses of the regulated lobbyist;
(iii) professional and technical research and assistance;
(iv) publications that expressly encourage communication with one
or more officials or employees;
(v) witnesses, including the name of each and the fees and expenses
paid to each;
(vi) except as otherwise reported under this paragraph, meals and
beverages for officials, employees, or members of the immediate families of officials or
employees;
(vii) except as provided in § 5–709(d)(2) of this subtitle, food,
beverages, and incidental expenses for officials of the Legislative Branch for meals and
receptions:
1. to which all members of [any legislative unit] THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY were invited; AND
2. THAT WERE OPEN TO THE PUBLIC;
(viii) food and beverages for members of the General Assembly at the
times and geographic locations of meetings of legislative organizations, as allowed under §
5–505(c)(2)(i)4 of this title;
(ix) food, lodging, and scheduled entertainment for officials and
employees at meetings at which the officials and employees were scheduled speakers or
scheduled panel participants;
(x) tickets and free admission extended to members of the General
Assembly, as a courtesy or ceremony to the office, to attend charitable, cultural, or political
events sponsored or conducted by the reporting entity, as allowed under § 5–505(c)(2)(viii)
of this title;
(xi) other gifts to or for officials, employees, or members of the
immediate families of officials or employees; and
(xii) other expenses; and

HOUSE BILL 136
(3) as to expenditures reported in item (2)(vii), (viii), (ix), and (x) of this
subsection, the date, location, and total expense of the regulated lobbyist for each meal,
reception, event, or meeting.
5–709.
(a) A regulated lobbyist who invites all members of [a legislative unit] THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY to a meal or reception shall, at least [5] 14 days before the date of
the meal or reception:
(1) extend a written invitation to all members of the [legislative unit]
GENERAL ASSEMBLY; and
(2) register the meal or reception with the Department of Legislative
Services by filing a report electronically as required by the Ethics Commission.
(b) A [legislative unit] registration report required under subsection (a) of this
section shall include[:
(1)] the TIME, date, and location of the meal or reception[; and
(2) the name of the legislative unit invited].
(c) (1) [Based on information contained in a legislative unit] WITHIN 1
BUSINESS DAY OF RECEIVING A registration report filed under subsection (a) of this
section, the Department of Legislative Services shall [publish once a week a list containing]
POST ON THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY WEBSITE the TIME, date, and location of each
upcoming meal or reception [and the name of the legislative unit invited] AS DISCLOSED
IN THE REPORT.
(2) (i) The Department of Legislative Services shall allow public
inspection of any [legislative unit] registration report required under this section during
regular business hours.
(ii) The Department of Legislative Services shall maintain a
photocopy or electronic copy of each registration report required under this section.
(d) (1) (i) A regulated lobbyist who is required to register under subsection
(a) of this section shall report the total cost of the meal or reception, and the name of each
sponsor who contributes to the cost and the amount of the contribution, to the Ethics
Commission within 14 days after the date of the meal or reception.
(ii) If any information required under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph is not known within 14 days after the date of the meal or reception, the regulated
lobbyist shall, as to the information not known, specify the nature and estimate the amount
of each item.

HOUSE BILL 136 7
(2) If all of the information required by paragraph (1)(i) of this subsection
is reported accurately and completely, the regulated lobbyist is not required to report the
cost of the meal or reception under § 5–705(b)(2)(vii) of this subtitle.
(3) The Ethics Commission shall allow public inspection of each
registration report required under this subsection during regular business hours.
(e) A report required under this section shall be filed electronically in the manner
required for reports filed under § 5–705 of this subtitle.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section(s) 5–101(x) through
(gg) and (gg–1) of Article – General Provisions of the Annotated Code of Maryland be
renumbered to be Section(s) 5–101(w) through (gg), respectively.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.